Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.140

Midwifery advisory committee—Generally.

The midwifery advisory committee is created.

The committee shall be composed of one physician who is a practicing obstetrician; one practicing physician; one certified nurse midwife licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; three midwives licensed under this chapter; and one public member, who shall have no financial interest in the rendering of health services. The committee may seek other consultants as appropriate, including persons trained in childbirth education and perinatology or neonatology.

The members are appointed by the secretary and serve at the pleasure of the secretary but may not serve more than five years consecutively. The terms of office shall be staggered. Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 706; 1991 c 3 s 114; 1987 c 467 s 5; 1981 c 53 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.